Washington statutes.
RCW 36.145.140

District treasurer—How appointed, duties and powers.

(1) If a district includes land that is entirely within a county and the land is not surrounded entirely by a city or town, then the treasurer of that county is the treasurer of the district. If a district includes land that is entirely within a county and the land is entirely surrounded by a city or town, or, if parts of the district include land within or surrounded by more than one jurisdiction, then the board of supervisors may, with the concurrence of the treasurers of all jurisdictions within which the district lies, appoint the treasurer of any of those jurisdictions to serve as the district treasurer. Except as specifically provided under this chapter, the duties of a district treasurer are as provided under applicable law.

(2) The district treasurer must establish a community facilities district fund, into which must be paid all district revenues. The district treasurer must also maintain any special funds created by the board of supervisors of the community facilities district, into which the district treasurer must place all money as the board of supervisors may, by resolution, direct. The treasurer may create such subfunds, accounts, and subaccounts as he or she deems necessary, consistent with applicable law.

(3) The district treasurer must pay assessment bonds and revenue bonds and the accrued interest thereon in accordance with their terms from the appropriate fund when interest or principal payments become due.

(4) All interest collected on community facilities district funds belongs to the district and must be deposited to its credit in the proper district funds.

[ 2010 c 7 s 505.]